California statutes. Education Code
(E) Whenever possible, prepares pupils for industry-recognized certifications.

(F) Whenever possible and appropriate, offers career technical education or STEM courses that also meet the subject requirements for admission to the California State University and the University of California.

(3) A class schedule that limits the attendance to the classes required in paragraphs (1) and (2) to pupils of the academy. Whenever possible, these classes should be block
 scheduled in a cluster to provide flexibility to academy teachers. During the 12th grade the number of academic classes may vary.

(4) A mentor from the business community during the pupil’s 11th grade year.

(5) An employer-based internship or work experience that occurs in the summer following the 11th grade or during 12th grade year.

(6) Additional motivational activities with private sector involvement to encourage academic and occupational preparation.

(f) Assurance that academy teachers have a common planning period to interchange pupil and educational information. A second planning period should be provided for the lead teacher in addition to the normal planning period for full-time teachers and be supported as a part of the school district’s
 matching funds, whenever practical.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 43.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

54693.

(a) The Superintendent shall establish eligibility criteria for school districts that apply for grants pursuant to this article. When establishing criteria, the Superintendent shall consider the commitment and need of the applicant school district. The Superintendent may consider school district indicators of need, including, but not limited to, the number or percent of pupils in poverty or with limited English proficiency, and the dropout rate.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the Superintendent shall prioritize proposals for new partnership academies
 based upon a school district’s enrollment of the following pupil groups:

(1) Unduplicated pupils, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 42238.02.

(2) Pupils from groups historically underrepresented in career technical education or STEM programs or professions.

(3) At-promise pupils, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 54690.

(c) The Superintendent may also prioritize new partnership academies for school districts located in a rural area or an economically disadvantaged area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 114, Sec. 3.   (AB 1923)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

54694.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall develop guidelines with respect to the California Partnership Academies. The guidelines shall include, but not be limited to, enrollment provisions, application procedures, and student eligibility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 574, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

54695.

(a) The ninth grade teachers and counselors in schools maintained by school districts approved to operate academies pursuant to this article shall identify students eligible to participate in an academy.

(b) Teachers and counselors in schools maintained by school districts approved to operate academies pursuant to this article, business representatives, and academy students of academies that are operating in the area shall be encouraged to make presentations to prospective students and their parents.

(c) The staff of each academy shall select students from among those who have expressed an interest in the academy and whose parents or guardians have approved the student’s participation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 574, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

54696.

The Legislature finds that each new academy requires technical assistance for the academy team, administrators, teachers, and private sector participants in the multiple aspects of the academy program that differ from the standard high school program. To provide for the transfer of the experiences gained in the operation of currently successful academies to new academies, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall develop a technical assistance team whose members have prior involvement in successful academy operation and make their expertise available, as necessary, to each new academy during its first two years of operation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 750, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

54697.

(a) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall select an entity (the “evaluating entity”) to conduct a long-term evaluation of the Partnership Academies conducted pursuant to this article using a random assignment of pupils into program and control groups. The participation of any school district in this long-term evaluation is voluntary.

(b) In order to qualify for participation in the evaluation of any Partnership Academy as described in subdivision (a), a school district shall demonstrate that the number of pupils seeking admission to the academy, who qualify for admission under applicable criteria, exceeds the number of openings in the academy.

(c) The evaluation shall be conducted on a basis that results in no net cost to the state or to any participating school district. The evaluating entity is responsible for obtaining, from other sources, any funding that is necessary for the purposes of subdivision (a).

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the evaluating entity shall have access to pupil records, to the extent permitted by federal law, as necessary to perform the evaluation. The evaluating entity shall ensure that all personally identifiable information regarding any pupil and his or her parent or guardian remains confidential.

(e) The evaluating entity shall coordinate its evaluation activities under subdivision (a) with the Superintendent of Public Instruction, and provide the superintendent with the results of the evaluation upon completion. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall submit the results of the evaluation to the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1213, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. University and College Opportunities Program [54700. - 54704.]

54700.

It is the intent and purpose of the Legislature that the University and College Opportunities Program provided for in this article shall be directed to improve the preparation of elementary and secondary school pupils for their successful matriculation through courses of study at two-year and four-year institutions of postsecondary education.

It is the intent and purpose of the Legislature that school districts be authorized to establish college preparatory programs targeted towards pupils from groups which are underrepresented in institutions of postsecondary education. It is further the intent of the Legislature that funding for these programs shall be derived from existing funds apportioned to participating school districts so as to result in no additional costs to the state. It is further the intent of the Legislature that participating school districts shall be encouraged to coordinate and utilize new and existing resources and service networks available to them and that they solicit the participation of the California Community Colleges, the California State University and Colleges, the University of California, and other public and private sector entities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1298, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

54701.

Any school district may apply to establish a University and College Opportunities Program with existing local or categorical funds. Any funds which may be donated by businesses or foundations may be used by participating districts to establish science and math regional centers which provide high quality science and mathematics instruction not normally available in regular school, to establish summer programs to provide academic enrichment in math, science, and English, and career awareness programs in professions requiring math and science backgrounds. Participation on the part of any school district shall be voluntary. Districts currently participating in existing categorical aid programs may utilize existing plans developed for these programs to describe their University and College Opportunities Program. The existing district plans and school plans submitted in the applications adopted by the State Board of Education pursuant to the rules and regulations adopted under Section 54704 shall contain a description of the University and College Opportunities Program, including the following:

(a) A description of the proposed program administration, staff training, and pupil identification and assessment components.

(b) A description of the comprehensive program, which shall be of sufficient size and scope to meet the intent of this article and which shall include, but not be limited to, the following criteria:

(1) Assurances that the instructional program will maintain a sound curriculum for pupils, particularly for pupils from those underrepresented groups identified pursuant to the passage of Resolution Chapter 212 of the Statutes of 1974, to meet the minimum university requirements to excel in math, science, and other technology-based careers.

(2) Academic advising to assist pupils who desire to enter into careers in the fields of math and science to select classes that best prepare them for study at the university and college levels in these fields.

(3) College counseling to assist pupils in preparing the necessary application forms for college admission, to procure scholarships and other financial aid, and to meet all deadlines for these programs.

(4) Career counseling to inform pupils of the opportunities and options available to them within the mathematics-based professions, such as the fields of engineering, business administration, and computer sciences.

(5) The establishment of tutorial programs and study groups to enable pupils to develop the study skills necessary to compete successfully at the postsecondary level.

(6) The establishment and operation of summer programs to provide academic enrichment in mathematics, science, and English as well as providing an orientation to those professions requiring a background in mathematics.

(7) The development of strategies for parental involvement.

(8) The development of appropriate pupil and staff incentive awards.

(9) The development of a system for collecting follow-up data on pupils who participate in the program.

(10) Assurances that the educational needs of pupils intended to be served by categorical funds used by this program will continue to be addressed.

(c) A description of the district’s plans for the participation of appropriate advisory groups, representatives from postsecondary institutions, representatives from private organizations and, whenever feasible, Mathematics, Engineering, Science Achievement (MESA) coordinators.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1298, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

54702.

School districts participating in the University and College Opportunities Program may enter into contractual agreements with neighboring community colleges, public and private universities and colleges, and other private and public sector entities for the utilization of facilities and services necessary to operate a University and College Opportunities Program. Participating districts may also enter into agreements with other districts to establish cooperative programs or to operate regional centers for instruction in the math- and science-related fields.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1298, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

54703.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall prepare rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this article, including rules and regulations which:

(a) Prescribe the procedure by which a district shall identify pupils who are traditionally underrepresented in higher education.

(b) Provide for the rendering of technical assistance which, upon request, shall be available to enable school districts and schools to design, implement, or evaluate the University and College Opportunities Programs authorized by this article.

(c) Identify effective practices regarding, but not necessarily limited to, University and College Opportunities Programs and which disseminate information regarding these programs to each participating school district and county superintendent of schools.

(d) Develop, in conjunction with the California Postsecondary Education Commission, common data elements, which can be used by secondary and postsecondary educators to assess and improve program performance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1298, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

54704.

The State Board of Education shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this article on or before March 1, 1983.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1298, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.1. California School Age Families Education Program [54740. - 54749.5.]

54740.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the California School Age Families Education Program (Cal-SAFE).

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1078, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

54741.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Adolescents, due to early pregnancy and childbearing, experience significant educational losses leading to a lifelong loss of schooling.

(b) Although less than a quarter of California’s pregnant and parenting teen mothers use welfare as teenagers, over time they make up a significant percentage of the AFDC caseload. Half of all unmarried teen mothers go on welfare within four years of the birth of their children and 42 percent of all AFDC mothers began families as teenagers.

(c) In 1995, there were 123,240 pregnant and parenting mothers age 18 years and younger.

(d) Approximately one-quarter of teen mothers in California will experience a second or subsequent birth while in their teen years.

(e) The number one reason cited by females for dropping out of school is pregnancy and parenting responsibilities, although existing school data collection systems do not include the number of pregnant and parenting pupils enrolled in school nor the number who drop out of school due to pregnancy and parenting responsibilities.

(f) Eighty percent of females who become mothers before the age of 18 do not finish high school, and 40 percent of females who give birth by age 15 do not complete the 8th grade.

(g) Young women with poor basic skills, regardless of ethnicity, are five times as likely to become mothers before age 16 as are those with average basic skills, and young women with poor or fair basic skills are four times as likely as those with average basic skills to have more than one child in their teens.

(h) Teen fathers are at high risk of low educational achievement, as they are more likely to drop out of school to secure low-paying, unskilled jobs with little promise of future improvement.

(i) Children of teenage mothers have a greater chance of experiencing behavior problems during adolescence, engaging in delinquent or criminal activities, becoming sexually active at a young age, and becoming teen parents.

(j) School-based programs for pregnant and parenting teens and their children offering a wide range of educational and supportive services, including child care and transportation, which begin during pregnancy and continue after childbirth, have been successful in increasing school enrollment and high school graduation rates, and reducing the incidence of low birth weight babies and repeat pregnancies.

(k) School-based programs targeting pregnant and parenting teens and their children are often nonexistent or fragmented, have inequitable program funding, lack comprehensive integrated school-linked services, lack useful school data, and often have not been evaluated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1078, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

54742.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to establish a comprehensive, continuous, and community linked school-based program that focuses on youth development and dropout prevention for pregnant and parenting pupils and on child care and development services for their children for the purpose of improving results for approximately 60,000 pupils and their children.

(b) The goals of the program are all of the following:

(1) A significant number of eligible female and male pupils in need of targeted supportive services related to school success will be served.

(2) Pupils shall have the opportunity to be continuously enrolled in the Cal-SAFE program through graduation from high school.

(3) Pupils served who receive program services for one or more years will earn a high school diploma or its equivalent or demonstrate progress towards completion of education goals.

(4) Pupils served who graduate will transition to postsecondary education, including a technical school, or into the world of work.

(5) Pupils served and their children will not become welfare dependent.

(6) Pupils served will demonstrate effective parenting skills.

(7) Pupils served will not have a repeat birth or father a repeat pregnancy before graduating from high school.

(8) Pregnant pupils served will not have a low birth weight baby.

(9) Children of enrolled teen parents will receive child care and development services based upon the assessed developmental and health needs of each child.

(10) Children of enrolled teen parents will receive health screening and immunizations except when the custodial parent annually provides a written request for an exemption pursuant to Section 49451 and Section 120365 of the Health and Safety Code.

(11) Children of enrolled teen parents will have enhanced school readiness, demonstrate progress towards meeting their assessed developmental goals, or both.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that if there are not enough resources to serve all eligible pupils, the program shall target services to pupils who are most in need or to pupils who are least likely to access services on their own.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that Cal-SAFE programs be integrated with local Adolescent Family Life programs and Cal-Learn programs in a manner that avoids duplication of services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1057, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

54743.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Case management” means a process that ensures that the pupil and child receive identified needed services in an efficient, supportive, and cost effective manner. The process is interactive, pupil-centered, culturally appropriate, and goal-oriented.

(b) “Child care and development program” means developmentally appropriate learning activities for the children of enrolled teen parents that are provided when the child’s teen parent is, or parents are, participating in a school-approved activity both during and outside the schoolday.

(c) “Intake process” means the interactive process upon entry into the Cal-SAFE program through which academic and service needs are inventoried and demographic data are collected.

(d) “Interventions” means services needed to correct or ameliorate a pupil’s health, psychosocial, educational, vocational, daily living, or economic problems, which may impede the pupil from achieving the program goals.

(e) “Local education agency” means a school district or county office of education.

(f) “Support services” means services, as referenced in subdivision (b) of Section 54746, that will enhance the academic ability of the enrolled pupil in order for her or him to earn a high school diploma or its equivalent and for healthy development of their children.

(g) “Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972 Regulations” refers to federal Public Law 92-318 and the regulations set forth in Section 106.1 and following of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, which prohibit discrimination against pupils, among other things, because of their pregnant or parenting status.

(h) “Expectant parent” means a female who is pregnant or a male who voluntarily identifies himself as the parent of an unborn child, and who meets eligibility criteria specified in Section 54747.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1168, Sec. 42.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

54744.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that communities implementing new programs or initiatives connect with existing program strategies and build upon existing local collaboratives, when possible, to provide a unified integrated system of service for children and families.

(b) No application for participation in the Cal-SAFE program is complete unless each county superintendent of schools, in conjunction with superintendents of school districts, the Adolescent Family Life Program, the Cal-Learn program, the local child care and development planning council as defined by Section 8499.5, and, as appropriate, other existing organizations such as Healthy Start and local job training councils, have developed a county service coordination plan for providing educational and related support services to pregnant and parenting teens and their children.

(c) The county service coordination plan shall include, at a minimum, all of the following information:

(1) Incidence of live births to teen mothers by a method to be determined by the State Department of Education.

(2) Incidence of pregnant and parenting pupils receiving welfare aid by a method to be determined by the State Department of Education.

(3) Incidence of low birth weight children born to teen mothers by a method to be determined by the State Department of Education.

(4) Educational alternatives for pregnant and parenting teens.

(5) Child care and development resources for the children of teen parents.

(6) Public and private resources providing support services necessary for pregnant and parenting teens to achieve academically.

(7) Gaps and overlaps in educational and support services for pregnant and parenting pupils and their children.

(8) Proposed strategies to address identified gaps and overlaps in services.

(d) The county service coordination plan shall be submitted to the State Department of Education no later than June 1, 2000.

(e) If the county service coordination plan is not submitted to the State Department of Education by June 1, 2000, a local education agency may only operate a Cal-SAFE program on an interim basis until January 1, 2001.

(f) The county superintendent of schools, in conjunction with superintendents of school districts, the Adolescent Family Life Program, the Cal-Learn program, the local child care and development planning council as defined by Section 8499.5, and, as appropriate, other existing organizations such as Healthy Start and local job training councils, shall annually review the county service coordination plan, update the plan as needed, disseminate the revised plan to superintendents of school districts within its jurisdiction, and submit a copy of the revised plan to the State Department of Education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 71, Sec. 20.   Effective July 5, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

54745.

(a) In the administration of the Cal-SAFE program, the following provisions apply:

(1) Participation by a school district or county superintendent of schools in the Cal-SAFE program is voluntary.

(2) The governing board of a school district or county superintendent of schools may submit an application to the State Department of Education in the manner, form, and by the date specified by the department to establish and maintain a Cal-SAFE program.

(3) A school district or county superintendent of schools approved to implement the Cal-SAFE program shall be funded as one program to be operated at one or multiple sites depending upon the need within the service area.

(4) Notwithstanding any other law, a school district or county superintendent of schools operating, by October 1, 1999, a School Age Parent and Infant Development Program pursuant to Article 17 (commencing with Section 8390) of Chapter 2 of Part 6, a Pregnant Minors Program pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 8900) of Part 6 and Section 2551.3, or a Pregnant and Lactating Students Program pursuant to Sections 49553 and 49559, as those provisions existed prior to January 1, 1999, or any combination thereof, that chooses to participate in the Cal-SAFE program shall have priority for Cal-SAFE program funding for an amount up to the dollar amount provided to each school district or county superintendent of schools under those provisions in the fiscal year prior to participation in the Cal-SAFE program, provided that an application is submitted and approved.

(5) If a school district or county superintendent of schools operating a School Age Parent and Infant Development Program, a Pregnant Minors Program, or a Pregnant and Lactating Students Program, or any combination thereof, chooses not to participate in the Cal-SAFE program, it is the intent of the Legislature that the funding it would have received for the operation of those programs shall be redirected to the Cal-SAFE program and the school district or county superintendent of schools may apply in a subsequent school year to operate a Cal-SAFE program.

(6) A school district or county superintendent of schools that terminates its Cal-SAFE program may reapply to establish a Cal-SAFE program.

(7) In order to continue implementation of the Cal-SAFE program beyond the initial three years of funding, each funded agency shall be reviewed by the department to determine progress towards achieving the goals set forth in Section 54742. Thereafter, funded agencies shall be reviewed and reauthorized every five years based upon a process determined by the department to continue implementation of a Cal-SAFE program.

(b) All of the following requirements apply to an application for the Cal-SAFE program:

(1) The governing board of a participating local education agency shall adopt a policy or resolution declaring its commitment to provide a comprehensive, continuous, community-linked program for expectant and parenting pupils and their children that reflects the cultural and linguistic diversity of the community.

(2) The local education agency shall provide assurance for participation in the development of the County Service Coordination Plan as described in Section 54744.

(3) A school district or county superintendent of schools shall agree to participate in the data collection and evaluation of the Cal-SAFE program.

(c) To implement a Cal-SAFE program, the funded school district, or county superintendent of schools shall meet all of the following criteria:

(1) Be in compliance with the regulations adopted pursuant to Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972.

(2) Ensure that enrolled pupils retain their right to participate in any comprehensive school or educational alternative programs in which they could otherwise enroll. School placement and instructional strategies shall be based upon the needs and styles of learning of the individual pupils. The classroom setting shall be the preferred instructional strategy unless an alternative is necessary to meet the needs of the individual parent, child, or both.

(3) Enroll pupils into the Cal-SAFE program on an open entry and open exit basis.

(4) Provide a quality education program to pupils in a supportive and accommodating learning environment with appropriate classroom strategies to ensure school access and academic credit for all work completed.

(5) Provide parenting education and life skills instruction to enrolled pupils.

(6) Make maximum utilization of available programs and facilities to serve expectant and parenting pupils and their children.

(7) Provide a quality child care and development program for the children of enrolled teen parents located on or near the schoolsite.

(8) Make maximum utilization of its local school food service program.

(9) Provide special school nutrition supplements, as defined by subdivision (b) of Section 49553, to pregnant and lactating pupils.

(10) Enter into formal partnership agreements, as necessary, with community-based organizations and other governmental agencies to assist pupils in accessing support services or to provide child care and development services.

(11) Provide staff development and community outreach in order to establish a positive learning environment and school policies supportive of expectant and parenting pupils’ academic achievement and to promote the healthy development of their children.

(12) Maintain an annual program budget and expenditure report to document that funds are expended pursuant to Section 54749.

(13) Assess no fees to enrolled pupils or their families for services provided through the Cal-SAFE program.

(14) Establish and maintain a database in the manner and form prescribed by the State Department of Education for purposes of program evaluation.

(15) Coordinate to the maximum extent possible with Cal-Learn program case managers provided pursuant to Section 11332.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and Adolescent Family Life Program case managers provided pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 124175) of Chapter 4 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 523, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

54746.

(a) In meeting the goals of the program and responding to the individual needs and differences of pupils and their children to be served, the funded agency shall complete an intake procedure regarding each pupil and child upon entry into the program and periodically as needed thereafter.

(b) Based upon the information provided during the intake procedure pursuant to subdivision (a), the funded agency shall determine appropriate levels and types of services to be provided. These services may not duplicate services currently provided to the pupil by a local Adolescent Family Life Program or Cal-Learn program. In addition to an academic program that meets district standards, necessary support services for pupils shall be funded by the calculation pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 54749. Allowable expenditures for support services are as follows:

(1) Parenting education and life skills instruction.

(2) Perinatal education and care, including childbirth preparation.

(3) Safe home-to-school transportation.

(4) Case management services.

(5) Comprehensive health education, including reproductive health care.

(6) Nutrition education, counseling, and meal supplements.

(7) School safety and violence prevention strategies targeted to expectant and parenting teens and their children.

(8) Academic support and youth development services, such as tutoring, mentoring, and community service internships.

(9) Career counseling, preemployment skills, and job training.

(10) Substance abuse prevention education, counseling, and treatment services.

(11) Mental health assessment, interventions, and referrals.

(12) Crisis intervention counseling services, including suicide prevention.

(13) Peer support groups and counseling.

(14) Family support and development services, including individual and family counseling.

(15) Child and domestic abuse prevention education, counseling, and services.

(16) Enrichment and recreational activities, as appropriate.

(17) Services that facilitate transition to postsecondary education, training, or employment.

(18) Support services for grandparents, siblings, and fathers of babies who are not enrolled in the Cal-SAFE program.

(19) Outreach activities to identify eligible pupils and to educate the community about the realities of teen pregnancy and parenting.

(c) The funded agency shall provide child care and development program services located on or near the schoolsite for the children of teen parents enrolled in the Cal-SAFE program. Program services shall be funded by the revenue generated pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 54749.

(1) Participation in the child care and development component of the Cal-SAFE program shall be voluntary.

(2) There is no minimum age for enrollment, but the child shall be eligible for enrollment in the child care and development component until the age of five years or the child is enrolled in kindergarten, whichever occurs first, as long as the teen parent is enrolled in the Cal-SAFE program.

(3) Each child shall have a health evaluation form signed by a physician, or his or her designee, before the child is allowed on the school campus or is enrolled in the child care and development program. Health screening and immunizations shall not be required when the custodial parent annually files a written request as provided for in Section 49451 and Section 120365 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) A developmental profile shall be maintained for each infant, toddler, and child. This development profile shall be utilized by the program staff to design a program that meets the infant’s, toddler’s, or child’s developmental needs.

(5) The arrangement of the child care site environment shall be safe, healthy, and comfortable for children and staff, easily maintained, and appropriate for meeting the developmental needs of the individual child. Child care sites shall meet the health and safety requirements specified in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 101151) of, and Subchapter 2 (commencing with Section 101351) of, Division 12 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(6) The child care and development component of the Cal-SAFE program shall operate pursuant to applicable sections of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8200) of Part 6. In addition to meeting the requirements of Section 8360, teachers shall have at least three semester units, or the equivalent number of quarter units, of coursework related to the care of infants and toddlers.

(7) The child care site shall be available as a laboratory for parenting or related courses that are offered by the funded agency with priority given to pupils enrolled in the Cal-SAFE program.

(d) In-service training for school staff on teen pregnancy and parenting-related issues may be funded from revenue generated pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 54749. However, use of these funds for this purpose shall supplement and, not supplant, existing resources in these areas.

(e) The database required pursuant to paragraph (14) of subdivision (c) of Section 54745 may be funded from revenue appropriated for purposes of subdivision (a) of Section 54749.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1168, Sec. 44.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

54746.5.

(a) Local education agencies that are applying to operate a Cal-SAFE program pursuant to Section 54749 but which are not in full compliance may submit a timeline and a corrective action plan for approval by the Superintendent of Public Instruction on a case-by-case basis to extend, to no later than June 30, 2002, a waiver from implementation of the child care and development requirements set forth in paragraph (7) of subdivision (c) of Section 54745 and in subdivision (c) of Section 54746.

(b) Local education agencies that are applying to operate a Cal-SAFE program pursuant to Section 2551.3 but are not in full compliance may submit a timeline and a corrective action plan for approval by the Superintendent of Public Instruction on a case-by-case basis to extend, to no later than June 30, 2002, a waiver from implementation of the child care and development physical environment requirements pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 54746, and as set forth in subdivision (d) of Section 101238 of, Section 101238.2 of, subdivision (a) of Section 101238.3 of, subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 101238.4 of, subdivisions (e), (h), and (j) of Section 101239 of, and paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 101239.2 of, Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(c) If the Superintendent of Public Instruction finds that a local education agency that has submitted a timeline and a corrective action plan pursuant to this section has not complied with all provisions of the corrective action plan as approved by the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the local education agency shall be ineligible for any funding pursuant to Section 2551.3 after the date of mailing of the written notification of noncompliance to the local education agency.

(d) For teachers in Cal-SAFE child care programs operated pursuant to Section 54749, the Superintendent of Public Instruction may waive the qualification requirements of paragraph (6) of subdivision (c) of Section 54746 for the 2001–02 fiscal year if the superintendent determines that the existence of compelling need is appropriately documented and the applicant is making satisfactory progress toward securing a permit issued by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing.

(e) For teachers in Cal-SAFE child care programs operated pursuant to Section 2551.3, the Superintendent of Public Instruction may waive the qualification requirements of paragraph (6) of subdivision (c) of Section 54746 until June 30, 2002, if the superintendent determines that the existence of compelling need is appropriately documented and the applicant is making satisfactory progress toward securing a permit issued by the Commission of Teacher Credentialing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 734, Sec. 48.   Effective October 11, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

54747.

(a) A male or female pupil, 18 years of age or younger, may enroll in the Cal-SAFE program and be eligible for all services afforded to pupils enrolled if he or she is an expectant parent, the custodial parent, or the noncustodial parent taking an active role in the care and supervision of the child, and has not earned a high school diploma or its equivalent.

(b) A pupil who is an expectant parent, custodial parent, or noncustodial parent taking an active role in the care and supervision of his or her child, has not earned a high school diploma or its equivalent, and has an active special education Individualized Education Plan (IEP) shall be eligible as long as she or he has an active IEP and meets the eligibility criteria as specified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 56026, and shall continue to receive services identified in the IEP while enrolled in the Cal-SAFE program.

(c) Pupils shall be eligible for enrollment on a voluntary basis for as long as they meet eligibility criteria specified in subdivisions (a) and (b) until they earn a high school diploma or its equivalent.

(d) A pupil may not be denied initial or continuous enrollment in the Cal-SAFE program for any of the following reasons:

(1) The pupil has had multiple pregnancies.

(2) The pupil has more than one child.

(3) The pupil’s eligibility status changed from expectant to parenting.
